test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-njuodas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - njuođâs: # 2A
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Nom: njuođâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Gen: njuottâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Acc: njuottâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Ill: njuo´tâsân
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Loc: njuo´tâsist
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Com: njuo´tâsáin
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Abe: njuottâsttáá
    njuođâs+N+Ess: [njuođâsin, njuo´tâsin]
    njuođâs+N+Par: [njuođâsid, njuo´tâsid]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Nom: [njuo´tâseh, njuottâseh]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Gen: [njuo´tâsij, njuottâsij]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Acc: [njuo´tâsijd, njuot'tâsijd]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Ill: [njuo´tâsáid, njuot'tâsáid]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Loc: [njuo´tâsijn, njuot'tâsijn]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Com: [njuo´tâsijguin, njuot'tâsijguin]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Abe: [njuo´tâsijttáá, njuot'tâsijttáá]
